Washington statutes.
RCW 43.362.040

Designation of sending and receiving areas—Inclusion of certain lands in programs for agricultural or forestland conservation.

(1) Counties shall use the following criteria to guide the designation of sending areas for participation in the regional transfer of development rights program:

(a) Land designated as agricultural or forestland of long-term commercial significance;

(b) Land designated rural that is being farmed or managed for forestry;

(c) Land whose conservation meets other state and regionally adopted priorities; and

(d) Land that is in current use as a manufactured/mobile home park as defined in chapter 59.20 RCW.

Nothing in these criteria limits a county's authority to designate additional lands as a sending area for conservation under a local county transfer of development rights program.

(2) Upon purchase of a transferable development right from land designated rural that is being farmed or managed for forestry, a county must include the land from which the right was purchased in any programs it administers for conservation of agricultural land or forestland.

(3) The designation of receiving areas is limited to incorporated cities or towns. Prior to designating a receiving area, a city or town should have adequate infrastructure planned and funding identified for development in the receiving area at densities or intensities consistent with what can be achieved under the local transfer of development rights program. Nothing in this subsection limits a city's, town's, or county's authority to designate additional lands for a receiving area under a local intrajurisdictional transfer of development rights program that is not part of the regional program.

(4) Cities and towns participating in the regional transfer of development rights program shall have discretion to determine which sending areas they receive development rights from to be used in their designated receiving areas.

(5) Designation of sending and receiving areas should include a process for public outreach consistent with the public participation requirements in chapter 36.70A RCW.

[ 2009 c 474 s 4.]